District of Columbia statutes.
16-507

Property subject to attachment; liens; priorities.

(a)

An attachment may be levied on the lands and tenements, and personal chattels of the defendant not exempt by law, whether in the defendant’s or a third person’s possession, and whether the defendant’s title to the property is legal or equitable, and upon his credits in the hands of a third person, whether due and payable or not, and upon his undivided interest in a partnership business.

(b)

An attachment shall be a lien on the property attached from the date of its delivery to the marshal. When different persons obtain attachments against the same defendant the priorities of the liens of the attachments shall be according to the dates when they were so delivered to the marshal.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 545, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 16-507.
1981 Ed., § 16-507.
This section is referenced in § 16-572.